Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 4. Disposal of Records.

Sec. 45.48.500.
Disposal of records.

When disposing of records that contain personal information, a business and a governmental agency shall take all reasonable measures necessary to protect against unauthorized access to or use of the records.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, if a business or governmental agency has otherwise complied with the provisions of AS

45.48.500

—

45.48.590

in the selection of a third party engaged in the business of record destruction, the business or governmental agency is not liable for the disposal of records under AS

45.48.500

—

45.48.590

after the business or governmental agency has relinquished control of the records to the third party for the destruction of the records.

A business or governmental agency is not liable for the disposal of records under AS

45.48.500

—

45.48.590

after the business or governmental agency has relinquished control of the records to the individual to whom the records pertain.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)

Sec. 45.48.510.
Measures to protect access.

The measures that may be taken to comply with AS

45.48.500

include

implementing and monitoring compliance with policies and procedures that require the burning, pulverizing, or shredding of paper documents containing personal information so that the personal information cannot practicably be read or reconstructed;

implementing and monitoring compliance with policies and procedures that require the destruction or erasure of electronic media and other nonpaper media containing personal information so that the personal information cannot practicably be read or reconstructed;

after due diligence, entering into a written contract with a third party engaged in the business of record destruction to dispose of records containing personal information in a manner consistent with AS

45.48.500

—

45.48.590

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)

Sec. 45.48.520.
Due diligence.

In AS

45.48.510

(3), due diligence ordinarily includes performing one or more of the following:

reviewing an independent audit of the third party’s operations and its compliance with AS

45.48.500

—

45.48.590

;

obtaining information about the third party from several references or other reliable sources and requiring that the third party be certified by a recognized trade association or similar organization with a reputation for high standards of quality review; or

reviewing and evaluating the third party’s information security policies and procedures, or taking other appropriate measures to determine the competency and integrity of the third party.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)

Sec. 45.48.530.
Policy and procedures.

A business or governmental agency shall adopt written policies and procedures that relate to the adequate destruction and proper disposal of records containing personal information and that are consistent with AS

45.48.500

—

45.48.590

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)

Sec. 45.48.540.
Exemptions.

A business or a governmental agency is not required to comply with AS

45.48.500

—

45.48.530

if federal law requires that the business or governmental agency act in a way that does not comply with AS

45.48.500

—

45.48.530

.

A business is not required to comply with AS

45.48.500

—

45.48.530

if

the business is subject to and in compliance with the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Financial Modernization Act; or

the manner of the disposal of the records of the business is subject to 15 U.S.C. 1681w (Fair Credit Reporting Act) and the business is complying with 15 U.S.C. 1681w.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008; am § 47 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (b)(2), substituted “15 U.S.C.1681w” for “15 U.S.C. 1861w”.

Sec. 45.48.550.
Civil penalty.

An individual, a business, or a governmental agency that knowingly violates AS

45.48.500

—

45.48.590

is liable to the state for a civil penalty not to exceed $3,000.

In this section, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)

Sec. 45.48.560.
Court action.

An individual who is damaged by a violation of AS

45.48.500

—

45.48.590

may bring a civil action in court to enjoin further violations and to recover for the violation actual economic damages, court costs allowed by the rules of court, and full reasonable attorney fees.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For the effect of this section on Rule 82, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, on criteria to be applied in the award of attorney fees, see § 6(b), ch. 92, SLA 2008 in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 45.48.590.
Definitions.

In AS

45.48.500

—

45.48.590

,

“business” means a person who conducts business in the state or a person who conducts business and maintains or otherwise possesses personal information on state residents; in this paragraph,

“conducts business” includes engaging in activities as a financial institution organized, chartered, or holding a license or authorization certificate under the laws of this state, another state, the United States, or another country;

“possesses” includes possession for the purpose of destruction;

“dispose” means

the discarding or abandonment of records containing personal information;

the sale, donation, discarding, or transfer of

any medium, including computer equipment or computer media, that contains records of personal information;

nonpaper media, other than that identified under (i) of this subparagraph, on which records of personal information are stored; and

equipment for nonpaper storage of information;

“governmental agency” means a state or local governmental agency, except for an agency of the judicial branch;

“personal information” means

an individual’s passport number, driver’s license number, state identification number, bank account number, credit card number, debit card number, other payment card number, financial account information, or information from a financial application; or

a combination of an individual’s

name; and

medical information, insurance policy number, employment information, or employment history;

“records” means material on which information that is written, drawn, spoken, visual, or electromagnetic is recorded or preserved, regardless of physical form or characteristics, but does not include publicly available information containing names, addresses, telephone numbers, or other information an individual has voluntarily consented to have publicly disseminated or listed.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)